Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1647.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 16, chapter 6, article 1.2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-919, to read: START_STATUTE16-919. Foreign contributions prohibited; ballot measures; certification A. A foreign corporation or person shall not give and a person, entity or committee shall not accept or use monies or in-kind goods or services that are contributed by a foreign corporation or person or a foreign nongovernmental source to influence the outcome of an election on a ballot measure, question, issue or proposition, including an initiative or referendum. B. A person, entity or committee that is required to file campaign finance reports pursuant to section 16-926 shall certify under penalty of perjury in those reports that the person, entity or committee has not accepted or used monies or in-kind goods or services in violation of subsection a of this section. C. Federally recognized sovereign tribal nations are exempt from this section. END_STATUTE